Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1667
Petit jury; postponement of service.

The court may postpone service of a petit juror from one jury panel to a specific future jury panel. A written form may be completed for each such juror, giving the juror's name and address and the reason for the postponement and bearing the signature of the district judge. Such form shall be entered upon the record of the court. The names of jurors transferred from one jury panel to another shall be added to the names drawn for a particular jury panel as drawn under section 25-1662.

Laws 1915, c. 248, § 10, p. 572;

C.S.1922, § 9104;

C.S.1929, § 20-1634;

R.S.1943, § 25-1634;

Laws 1953, c. 72, § 13(2), p. 235;

Laws 1965, c. 124, § 1, p. 461;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 25-1634.01;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 24.